Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1259.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 16-906, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-906. Committee statement of organization; amendment; committee limitation; alternate mailing address A. A committee shall file a statement of organization with the filing officer within ten days after qualifying as a committee. B. Except as provided in subsection H of this section, a statement of organization shall include the following committee information: 1. The committee name, mailing address, e-mail email address, website, if any, and telephone number, if any, and the type of committee. The committee name shall include: (a) For a candidate committee, the candidate's first or last name and, if the candidate has a candidate committee open for more than one office, the office sought. (b) For a political action committee that is sponsored, the sponsor's name or commonly known nickname. 2. The name, mailing address, e-mail email address, website, if any, and telephone number of any sponsor. 3. The name, physical location or street address, e-mail email address, telephone number, occupation and employer of the committee's chairperson and treasurer. For a candidate committee, the candidate may serve as both chairperson and treasurer. 4. For a candidate committee for a partisan office, the candidate's party affiliation. 5. A listing of all banks or other financial institutions used by the committee. 6. A statement that the committee chairperson and committee treasurer have read the filing officer's campaign finance and reporting guide, agree to comply with this article and articles 1, 1.2, 1.3, 1.4, 1.5, 1.6 and 1.7 of this chapter, and agree to accept all notifications and service of process via the e-mail email address provided by the committee. C. A committee shall file an amended statement of organization within ten days after any change in committee information. D. On filing a statement of organization, the filing officer shall issue an identification number to the committee. E. A standing committee shall file a statement of organization with the secretary of state and a copy of the statement in each jurisdiction in which the committee is active.  Only the secretary of state shall issue an identification number. F. A candidate may have only one committee in existence for the same office during the same election cycle. G. On filing a statement of organization, a political action committee or political party may perform any lawful activity, including making contributions, making expenditures or conducting issue advocacy, without establishing a separate committee for each activity or specifying each activity in its statement of organization. H. A person may provide an alternate mailing address for the purposes of this section and may attest that the person's residence is in the electoral district if the person's residential address is both: 1. Required to be included pursuant to subsection B of this section. 2. protected from public disclosure pursuant to section 16-153. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 18-444, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE18-444. Duty to file financial disclosure statement; contents; exceptions; alternate mailing address A. In addition to other statements and reports required by law, every public officer, as a matter of public record, shall file with the secretary of state on a form prescribed by the secretary of state a verified financial disclosure statement covering the preceding calendar year.  Except as provided in subsection G of this section, the statement shall disclose: 1. The name and home or work address of the public officer, whether the public officer's spouse is a member of the public officer's household, the number of minor children who are members of the public officer's household and all names and addresses under which each does business.  If disclosure of the identity of the public officer's spouse or minor child would otherwise be required, a public officer may comply with the identification requirement by using the term "spouse" or "minor child", as applicable. 2. The name and address of each employer and of each other source of compensation other than gifts amounting to more than one thousand dollars $1,000 received during the preceding calendar year by the public officer and members of his the public officer's household in their own names, or by any other person for the use or benefit of the public officer or members of his the public officer's household, a description of the services for which the compensation was received and the nature of the employer's business. This paragraph shall does not be construed to require the disclosure of individual items of compensation that constituted a portion of the gross income of the business from which the public officer or members of his the public officer's household derived compensation. 3. For a controlled business, a description of the goods or services provided by the business, and if any single source of compensation to the business during the preceding calendar year amounts to more than ten thousand dollars $10,000 and is more than twenty-five percent of the gross income of the business, the disclosure shall also include a description of the goods or services provided to the source of compensation. For a dependent business the statement shall disclose a description of the goods or services provided by the business and a description of the goods or services provided to the source of compensation from which the dependent business derived the amount of gross income described in section 38-541, paragraph 4. If the source of compensation for a controlled or dependent business is a business, the statement shall disclose a description of the business activities engaged in by the source of compensation. 4. The names and addresses of all businesses and trusts in which the public officer or members of his the public officer's household, or any other person for the use or benefit of the public officer or members of his the public officer's household, had an ownership or beneficial interest of over one thousand dollars $1,000 at any time during the preceding calendar year, and the names and addresses of all businesses and trusts in which the public officer or any member of his the public officer's household held any office or had a fiduciary relationship at any time during the preceding calendar year, together with the amount or value of the interest and a description of the interest, office or relationship. 5. All Arizona real property interests and real property improvements, including specific location and approximate size, in which the public officer, any member of his the public officer's household or a controlled or dependent business held legal title or a beneficial interest at any time during the preceding calendar year, and the value of any such interest, except that this paragraph does not apply to a real property interest and improvements thereon used as the primary personal residence or for the personal recreational use of the public officer. If a public officer, any member of his the public officer's household or a controlled or dependent business acquired or divested any such interest during the preceding calendar year, he the public officer shall also disclose that the transaction was made and the date it occurred. If the controlled or dependent business is in the business of dealing in real property interests or improvements, disclosure need not include individual parcels or transactions as long as the aggregate value of all parcels of such property is reported. 6. The names and addresses of all creditors to whom the public officer or members of his the public officer's household, in their own names or in the name of any other person, owed a debt of more than one thousand dollars $1,000 or to whom a controlled business or a dependent business owed a debt of more than ten thousand dollars which $10,000 that was also more than thirty percent of the total business indebtedness at any time during the preceding calendar year, listing each such creditor.  This paragraph shall does not be construed to require the disclosure of debts owed by the public officer or any member of his the public officer's household resulting from the ordinary conduct of a business other than a controlled or dependent business nor shall or require the disclosure be required of credit card transactions, retail installment contracts, debts on residences or recreational property exempt from disclosure under paragraph 5 of this subsection, debts on motor vehicles not used for commercial purposes, debts secured by cash values on life insurance or debts owed to relatives. It is sufficient disclosure of a creditor if the name and address of a person to whom payments are made is disclosed. If the public officer, any member of his the public officer's household or a controlled or dependent business incurred or discharged a debt which that is reportable under this subsection during the preceding calendar year, the report shall disclose that the transaction was made and the date it occurred. 7. The identification and amount of each debt exceeding one thousand dollars $1,000 owed at any time during the preceding calendar year to the public officer and members of his the public officer's household in their own names, or to any other person for the use or benefit of the public officer or any member of his the public officer's household. The disclosure shall include the identification and amount of each debt exceeding ten thousand dollars $10,000 to a controlled business or dependent business which that was also more than thirty percent of the total indebtedness to the business at any time during the preceding calendar year.  This paragraph shall does not be construed to require the disclosure of debts from the ordinary conduct of a business other than a controlled or dependent business.  If the public officer, any member of his the public officer's household or a controlled or dependent business incurred or discharged a debt which that is reportable under this subsection during the preceding year, the report shall disclose that the transaction was made and the date it occurred. 8. The name of each source of any gift, or accumulated gifts from a single source, of more than five hundred dollars $500 received by the public officer and members of his the public officer's household in their own names during the preceding calendar year, or by any other person for the use or benefit of the public officer or any member of his the public officer's household except gifts received by will or by virtue of intestate succession, or received by way of distribution from any inter vivos or testamentary trust established by a spouse or by an ancestor, or gifts received from any other member of the household or relatives to the second degree of consanguinity. 9. A list of all business licenses issued to, held by or in which the public officer or any member of his the public officer's household had an interest at any time during the preceding calendar year, including the name in which the license was issued, the type of business and its location. 10. A list of all bonds, together with their value, issued by this state or any political subdivision of this state and held at any time during the preceding calendar year by the public officer or any member of his the public officer's household, which bonds issued by a single entity had a value in excess of one thousand dollars $1,000. If the public officer or any member of his the public officer's household acquired or divested any bonds during the preceding calendar year which that are reportable under this paragraph, the fact that the transaction occurred and the date shall also be shown. 11. The name of each meeting, conference or other event where the public officer is participating in the public officer's official capacity if travel-related expenses of one thousand dollars $1,000 or more were incurred on behalf of the public officer and the travel-related expenses are not paid by the public officer. B. If an amount or value is required to be reported pursuant to this section, it is sufficient to report whether the amount or value of the equity interest falls within: 1. Category 1, one thousand dollars $1,000 to twenty-five thousand dollars $25,000. 2. Category 2, more than twenty-five thousand dollars $25,000 to one hundred thousand dollars $100,000. 3. Category 3, more than one hundred thousand dollars $100,000. C. This section does not require the disclosure of any information that is privileged by law. D. The statement required to be filed pursuant to subsection A of this section shall be filed by all persons who qualified as public officers at any time during the preceding calendar year on or before January 31 of each year with the exceptions that a public officer appointed to fill a vacancy shall, within sixty days following his the public officer's taking of such office, shall file a financial disclosure statement covering as his the public officer's annual period the twelve month period ending with the last full month prior to before the date of his the public officer's taking office, and a public officer whose final term expires less than thirty-one days into the immediately following calendar year may file the public officer's final financial disclosure at the same time as the disclosure for the last immediately preceding year. E. The secretary of state shall prepare written guidelines, forms and samples for completing the financial disclosure statement required by this section.  A copy of the guidelines, forms and samples shall be distributed to each public officer and shall be made available to each candidate required to file a financial disclosure statement pursuant to section 38-543. F. Beginning January 1, 2017, the statement required to be filed in subsection D of this section may be filed by the public officer in a form prescribed by the secretary of state that includes authorization for future filings to be submitted in an electronic format. Any subsequent filings required to be filed in subsection D of this section may be filed in an electronic format as prescribed by the secretary of state. Beginning January 1, 2017, any statements that are required to be filed by a local public officer pursuant to an ordinance, rule, resolution or regulation adopted pursuant to section 38-545 may be filed in an electronic format as prescribed by the secretary of state. g. A person may provide an alternate mailing address for the purposes of this section and may attest that the person's residence is in the electoral district if the person's residential address is both: 1. Required to be disclosed pursuant to subsection A of this section. 2. protected from public disclosure pursuant to section 16-153. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 19, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.